Tennessee statutes. Title 20 Civil Procedure
Part 3

Arguments

20-9-301. Opening statements — Right of parties to make.

In all actions of a civil or criminal nature tried before a jury, all parties to the action shall have the right prior to the presentation of any evidence in the case to make an opening statement to the court and jury setting forth their respective contentions, views of the facts and theories of the lawsuit.

Acts 1969, ch. 90, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-1329.

Textbooks. Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), §§ 26.30, 26.32.

Law Reviews.

Technology and Opening Statements: A Bridge to the Virtual Trial of the Twenty-First Century? 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 523 (2000).

The Timing of Opinion Formation by Jurors in Civil Cases: An Empirical Examination, 67 Tenn. L. Rev. 627 (2000).

20-9-302. Declaration may be read to jury.

In the trial of any civil suit, counsel shall be permitted to read the counsel's entire declaration, including the amount sued for, to the jury at the beginning of the lawsuit, and may refer to the declaration in argument or summation to the jury.

Acts 1963, ch. 79, § 3; T.C.A., § 20-1328.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 212.

Tennessee Criminal Practice and Procedure (Raybin), § 26.10.

Law Reviews.

Counting Angels and Weighing Anchors: Per Diem Arguments for Noneconomic Personal Injury Tort Damages (Joseph H. King, Jr.), 71 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2003).

Malpractice in Dealing with Medical Malpractice, 6 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 437.

Cited: Smartt v. Fleming, 481 S.W.2d 774, 1972 Tenn. App. LEXIS 339 (Tenn. Ct. App. 1972); Elliott v. Cobb, 320 S.W.3d 246, 2010 Tenn. LEXIS 875 (Tenn. Sept. 23, 2010).

20-9-303. Demonstrative evidence permitted in argument.

In the trial of any civil suit, counsel for either party shall be permitted to use a blackboard, models or similar devices, also any picture, plat or exhibit introduced in evidence, in connection with the counsel's argument to the jury for the purpose of illustrating the counsel's contentions with respect to the issues that are to be decided by the jury; provided, that counsel shall not, in writing, present any argument that could not properly be made orally.

Acts 1963, ch. 79, § 1; T.C.A., § 20-1326.

Textbooks. Tennessee Law of Evidence (2nd ed., Cohen, Paine and Sheppeard), § 401.13.

Law Reviews.

Counting Angels and Weighing Anchors: Per Diem Arguments for Noneconomic Personal Injury Tort Damages (Joseph H. King, Jr.), 71 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2003).

Tangible Evidence in Tennessee (Ronald L. Gilman), 22 No. 3, Tenn. B.J. 19 (1986).

Cited: State v. Wiseman, 643 S.W.2d 354, 1982 Tenn. Crim. App. LEXIS 468 (Tenn. Crim. App. 1982); Chapman v. Lewis, — S.W.3d —, 2010 Tenn. App. LEXIS 479 (Tenn. Ct. App. July 28, 2010).

20-9-304. Monetary value of pain and suffering permitted in argument.

In the trial of a civil suit for personal injuries, counsel shall be allowed to argue the worth or monetary value of pain and suffering to the jury; provided, that the argument shall conform to the evidence or reasonable deduction from the evidence in such case.

Acts 1963, ch. 79, § 2; T.C.A., § 20-1327.

Law Reviews.

Counting Angels and Weighing Anchors: Per Diem Arguments for Noneconomic Personal Injury Tort Damages (Joseph H. King, Jr.), 71 Tenn. L. Rev. 1 (2003).